Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2579.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6079YH (7) 91 sc/ns H.F. 2579 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 723.7 Disorderly conduct ââ 1 religious services. 2 1. A person shall not intentionally engage in conduct that 3 substantially obstructs, prevents, or interferes with the 4 orderly conduct of a religious service or assembly, including 5 by creating persistent or unreasonable noise, physically 6 obstructing an entrance, or creating a reasonable apprehension 7 of danger among congregants. 8 2. A person who commits a violation of this section commits 9 a class âDâ felony. 10